New York, session 2025-2026, S5758.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 48 of the general city law, as separately amended 2 by chapters 173 and 279 of the laws of 2020, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 § 48. Inspectors; qualifications; notice. The local board of health or 5 an official or board designated by local law of such city, as the case 6 may be shall detail, designate or appoint an inspector or inspectors of 7 plumbing, subject, however, to the provisions or limitations of law, 8 regulating the appointment of such inspectors by such board of health or 9 an official or board designated by local law of such city. All inspec- 10 tors of plumbing who are detailed, designated or appointed shall be 11 practical plumbers and shall not be engaged directly or indirectly in 12 the business of plumbing, during the period of their appointment. They 13 shall be citizens and actual residents of the city in which they are 14 appointed; except in the cities of Cortland and Corning, where such 15 inspectors shall be citizens and actual residents of the county or coun- 16 ties wherein the city is situated, or in an abutting or adjacent county; 17 except in the city of Rochester, where such inspectors shall be citizens 18 and actual residents of the county wherein the city is situated; except 19 in the city of Watertown, where such inspectors shall be citizens and 20 actual residents of the county wherein the city is situated except in 21 the city of Middletown, where such inspectors shall be citizens and 22 actual residents of the county wherein the city is situated, or within a 23 twenty-five mile radius of the city of Middletown as long as such 24 inspectors are citizens and actual residents of this state; except in 25 the city of Jamestown, where such inspectors shall be citizens and actu- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10377-01-5 S. 5758 2 1 al residents of the county wherein the city is situated; except in the 2 city of Tonawanda, where such inspectors shall be citizens and actual 3 residents of the county wherein the city is situated, or in an abutting 4 or adjacent county; except in any city with a population of less than 5 twenty-five thousand, where such inspectors shall be citizens and actual 6 residents of the county or counties wherein the city is situated. Before 7 entering upon the discharge of their duties as such inspectors they 8 shall each be required to obtain a certificate of competency from said 9 examining board. They shall be entitled to receive compensation to be 10 fixed by the officer, board, commission or department having power to 11 fix salaries generally or, if there be no officer, board, commission or 12 department thereof having such power, by the board of [aldermen] alder- 13 persons or common council. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.